src/scripts/Russian/untranslit.foma
# SPDX-License-Identifier: GPL-3.0-or-later

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define Untransliterate 
a @-> а || _ ,, 
b @-> б || _ ,, 
{ch} @-> ч || _ ,, 
c @-> ц || _ ,, 
d @-> д || _ ,, 
e @-> е || _ ,, 
f @-> ф || _ ,, 
g @-> г || _ ,, 
h @-> х || _ ,, 
i @-> и || _ ,, 
{ja} @-> я || _ ,, 
{je} @-> е || _ ,, 
{jo} @-> ё || _ ,, 
{ju} @-> ю || _ ,, 
j @-> й || _ ,, 
{kh} @-> х || _ ,, 
k @-> к || _ ,, 
l @->л || _ ,, 
m @-> м || _ ,, 
n @-> н || _ ,, 
o @-> о || _ ,, 
p @-> п || _ ,, 
q @-> к || _ ,, 
r @-> р || _ ,, 
{sh} @-> ш || _ ,, 
{shch} @-> щ || _ ,, 
s @-> с || _ ,, 
t @-> т || _ ,, 
u @-> у || _ ,, 
v @-> в || _ ,, 
w @-> в || _ ,, 
x @-> к с || _ ,, 
{ya} @-> я || _ ,, 
{ye} @-> е || _ ,, 
{yo} @-> ё || _ ,, 
{yu} @-> ю || _ ,, 
y @-> й || [.#.|a|e|i|o|u|y] _ ,, 
y @-> ы || \[.#.|a|e|i|o|u|y] _ ,, 
{zh} @-> ж || _ ,, 
z @-> з || _ ; 

regex 
[y:{игрек}] .P. Untransliterate;
